West Virginia, session 2025, HB2162.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. Formation of credit union. §31C-2-8. Tax Exemption. [Repealed]. NOTE: The purpose of this bill is to repeal the tax exemption for credit unions. Strike-throughs indicate language that would be stricken from a heading or the present law and underscoring indicates new language that would be added. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home